New Mexico, session 2026, SB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATIONS.-- A. The following amounts are appropriated from the general fund to the department of public safety for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for the following purposes: (1) one million dollars ($1,000,000) to modernize and enhance the statewide operations and systems for turquoise alerts, AMBER alerts, Brittany alerts and silver alerts, as well as endangered persons and missing persons advisories; and (2) three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for two full-time employees, one for the missing persons information clearinghouse to serve as a tribal liaison analyst and point of contact for tribal, state and local law enforcement and the second employee for the information technology division to work as a developer on the development of a dedicated endangered persons and missing persons portal. B. Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the Indian affairs department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for a statewide outreach and public service campaign to build community awareness and understanding, improve response efficacy and strengthen trust in the turquoise alert system. C. Any unexpended balance of an appropriation made pursuant to this section remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -